Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Chapter 5. Child Labor.
§ 40.1-112.
Solicitation generally.

In order to provide for enforcement of the child labor laws and the protection of employees, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation, except a nonprofit organization as defined in § 501 (c) (3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, to engage in or to employ any person for, or suffer or permit any person in his employment to work in, any trade in any street or public place, including but not limited to candy sales or soliciting for commercial purposes, selling, or obtaining subscription contracts or orders for books, magazines or other periodical publications other than newspapers, without obtaining from the Commissioner a permit to conduct such business. No permit shall be required for the placement of advertisements or literature on or near a business or private residence, if there is no attempt, in person, to solicit business or make a sale at the time of the placement of the material.

Such permits shall be valid from the date of issuance until June 30 next following the date of issuance. Applications may be made not more than thirty days prior to the requested date of issuance on forms furnished by the Commissioner, and the applicant shall supply such information as is required concerning his place or places of business, the prospective number of his employees, and the proposed hours of work and rate of compensation for such employees. A separate permit shall be required for each place of business which the applicant operates within this Commonwealth.

Each permittee shall maintain such records as may be prescribed by the Commissioner showing the name, residence address and age of each employee, the hours worked by each employee, the place where such work was performed, and the compensation paid and payable to such employee. Such records shall be available for inspection by the Commissioner or a representative designated by him during business hours.

No child shall be employed or permitted to work by or for any permittee unless all the following conditions are satisfied:

The child is at least sixteen years of age;

The permittee has a permanent business address within this Commonwealth; and

The child works at all times under the immediate supervision of an adult.

No child shall be required, permitted or directed to make any false statement representing himself, his employer or products or services in his employment.

Any person violating any provision or condition of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor for each such violation. Any violation of this section by a permittee or with his knowledge and consent shall in addition be grounds for revocation of the permit.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-118.3; 1964, c. 315; 1966, c. 603; 1968, c. 743; 1970, c. 321; 1973, c. 13; 1979, c. 219; 1982, c. 137; 1991, c. 511; 1998, c. 157.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “or soliciting for commercial purposes, selling” for “solicitation, sale,” and deleted “of” preceding “subscription,” and added the second sentence; and in the last sentence of subsection B, substituted “business which the applicant” for “business or location at which applicant.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia criminal law for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 241 (1980).

§ 40.1-113.
Child labor offenses; civil penalties.

Whoever employs, procures, or, having under his control, permits a child to be employed in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter other than §§

40.1-100.2

,

40.1-103

and

40.1-112

, shall be subject to a civil penalty that (i) shall not exceed $10,000 for each violation that results in the employment of a child who is seriously injured or who dies in the course of that employment and (ii) shall not exceed $1,000 for each other violation. In determining the amount of such penalty, the appropriateness of such penalty to the size of the business of the person charged and the gravity of the violation shall be considered.

The Commissioner shall notify any employer who he alleges has violated any provision of this section by certified mail or overnight delivery service. Such notice shall contain a description of the alleged violation. Within 21 days of receipt of notice of the alleged violation, the employer may request an informal conference regarding such violation with the Commissioner. If the employer fails to contest the violation by requesting such an informal conference within 21 days following receipt of the notice of the alleged violation, the violation and proposed penalty will become a final order of the Commissioner and not subject to review by any court or agency except upon a showing of good cause. Such informal conference shall result in a decision by the Commissioner that will be appealable to the appropriate circuit court. The Department shall send a copy of the Commissioner’s decision to the employer by certified mail or overnight delivery service. The employer may file a notice of an appeal only within 30 days from the receipt of the decision. The appeal shall be on the agency record. With respect to matters of law, the burden shall be on the party seeking review to designate and demonstrate an error of law subject to review by the court. With respect to issues of fact, the duty of the court shall be limited to ascertaining whether there was substantial evidence in the record to reasonably support the Commissioner’s findings of fact.

Civil penalties owed under this section shall be paid to the Commissioner for deposit into the general fund of the treasury of the Commonwealth. The Commissioner shall prescribe procedures for the payment of proposed penalties which are not contested by employers.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-119; 1964, c. 504; 1970, c. 321; 1973, c. 425; 1979, c. 348; 1982, c. 416; 1991, c. 511; 2007, c. 667; 2015, c. 285.

Cross references.

For provisions as to enforcement of this title and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, and penalties for violations, see §

40.1-49.4

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 667 inserted the language beginning “that (i) shall” and ending “and (ii) shall” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 285, in subsection A, deleted “, or issues an employment certificate,” following “child to be employed” in the first sentence, and deleted “The determination by the Commissioner shall be final, unless within fifteen days after receipt of such notice the person charged with the violation notifies the Commissioner by certified mail that he intends to contest the proposed penalty before the appropriate general district court.” at the end; added subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (2007).

§ 40.1-114.
Enforcement of child labor law.

The Commissioner, with the assistance of state and local law-enforcement officers, shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and shall have authority to appoint such representatives as may be necessary to secure the enforcement of this chapter. He shall make all necessary rules and regulations for carrying out the purposes of this chapter, and shall prescribe such forms as may be required for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-120; 1970, c. 321; 1979, c. 219; 2015, c. 285.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 285, in the last sentence, substituted “prescribe such forms” for “and supply to the proper officials blanks for employment certificates and such other forms.”

§ 40.1-115.
School attendance.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as qualifying in any way the provisions of the compulsory education laws of this Commonwealth, nor as authorizing the employment of any child who is absent unlawfully from school.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-121; 1970, c. 321.

§ 40.1-116.
Curfew ordinances not affected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit the violation of a curfew ordinance of any city.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-122; 1970, c. 321.